District of Columbia statutes.
48-502

Repealed

Sale of horse meat and horse meat product—Violations.

Repealed.

July 3, 1943, 57 Stat. 372, ch. 188, § 2
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 445, 32 DCR 4450
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 8(e), 49 DCR 1945
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(e) of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(e) of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of §§ 48-501 to 48-503, see § 8(e) of Food Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-55, December 6, 2001, law notification 49 DCR 356).
1973 Ed., § 33-503.
1981 Ed., § 33-403.